Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Chapter 169 of
the Acts of 2012, as amended by Chapter 10 of the Acts of 2016, is hereby further amended by
deleting sections 5, 6, and 8 and inserting in place thereof the following sections:
Section 5. This act may be restarted by an affirmative vote of a majority of the voters at
any regular or special election at which the question of restarting is placed on the ballot by the
select board. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, and sections 7 and 8 shall take effect 30 days after an
affirmative vote by the town.
Section 6. This act may be paused by an affirmative vote of a majority of the voters at
any regular or special town election at which the question of pausing is placed on the ballot by
the select board. If paused by an election, it must be restarted by a subsequent regular or special
election. Pausing of sections 1 to 4, inclusive, and sections 7 and 8 shall take effect 30 days after
an affirmative vote by the town.
Section 8. Extending, Pausing, or Restarting the Exemption by Town Meeting.
of 2

(a) The town of Sudbury, at town meeting, shall every 3 calendar years, provided that this
act has not sooner paused pursuant to subsection (c), vote on the following question:
“Shall an act passed in the general court in the year 2012 entitled, ‘An act authorizing the
town of Sudbury to establish a means tested senior citizen property tax exemption’ be extended
for another 3 years?”
(b) If any vote taken at town meeting pursuant to subsection (a) is in the affirmative then
this act shall continue in effect.
(c) If any vote taken at town meeting pursuant to subsection (a) is in the negative then
this act shall be paused until such time as town meeting votes to restart it for another 3-year term.
(d) If paused, this act may be restarted by a subsequent vote of town meeting on the
question as phrased in subsection (a) above, using the words “restarted and extended” instead of
the word “extended”.
of 2